District of Columbia statutes.
1-307.21

Expired

Definitions.

Expired.

Sept. 23, 1986, D.C. Law 6-155, § 2, 33 DCR 4809
Aug. 17, 1991, D.C. Law 9-41, § 2(a), (b), 38 DCR 4979
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-192, § 2182(a), 53 DCR 6899
Health care professional volunteer assistance protection, see § 7-402.
This section is referenced in § 7-402.
1981 Ed., § 1-308.1.
For temporary (225 day) extension of program, see § 2 of Free Clinic Assistance Program Extension Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-54, December 6, 2001, law notification 49 DCR 355).
Section 17 of D.C. Law 17-63 repealed this section as of the date when the District of Columbia Free Clinic Captive Insurance Company becomes operational.
Section 19(b) of D.C. Law 17-63 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary extension of the Free Clinic Assistance Program Act of 1986 (D.C. Law 6-155) through the year 2001, see § 2 of the Free Clinic Assistance Program Extension Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-486, January 2, 1997, 44 DCR 632), and § 2 of the Free Clinic Assistance Program Extension Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-38, March 31, 1997, 44 DCR 2042).
For temporary (90 day) extension of the Free Clinic Assistance Program of 1986 (D.C. Law 6-155) until September 23, 2004, see § 2 of Free Clinic Assistance Program Extension Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-110, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7634), and § 2 of Free Clinic Assistance Program Extension Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-139, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 9930).
For temporary (90 day) extension of program, see § 2(b) of Free Clinic Assistance Program Extension Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-407, July 10, 2002, 49 DCR 7109).
For temporary (90 day) extension of program, see § 2(b) of Free Clinic Assistance Program Extension Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-477, October 3, 2002, 49 DCR 9572).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2182(a) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-477, August 8, 2006, 53 DCR 7068).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2182(a) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-499, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 8845).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2182(a) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-1, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1165).
Short title: Section 2181 of D.C. Law 16-192 provided that subtitle O of title II of the act may be cited as the “Free Clinic Assistance Program Coverage Amendment Act of 2006”.

Expiration of Law 6-155

Section 7(b) of D.C. Law 6-155, as amended by § 2 of the Free Clinic Assistance Program Act of 1986 Amendment Emergency Act of 1988 (D.C. Act 7-203, June 30, 1988, 35 DCR 5439), § 2 of D.C. Law 7-172, § 2 of D.C. Law 7-223, § 4 of the Residential Property Tax Relief Act of 1977 Application Deadline and Free Clinic Assistance Program Act of 1986 Extension Emergency Amendment Act of 1991 (D.C. Act 9-83, September 13, 1991, 38 DCR 6021), § 4 of D.C. Law 9-53, § 3 of D.C. Law 9-65, and by § 2 of D.C. Law 11-175 provided that the act shall expire 15 years from the day it became effective. D.C. Law 6-155 became effective September 23, 1986.

Repeal of Part B: Section 16 of D.C. Law 17-196 provided: “The Free Clinic Assistance Program Act of 1986, effective September 23, 1986 (D.C. Law 6-155; D.C. Official Code § 1-307.21 et seq.), is repealed as of the date when the Agency becomes operational.”